en: Urad flour
fr: Farines d'urad
hr: Urad brašno
nl: Uradmelen, Urad-melen

fr: Farines de cossettes d'igname
nl: Yam melen

en: Cassava flour
fr: Farines de manioc
hr: Brašno od kasave
lt: Kasavos miltai
nl: Maniokmelen

en: Food additives, Food additive
ar: مضاف غذائي
az: Qida əlavələri
ba: Аҙыҡ өҫтәмәләре
be: Харчовыя дабаўкі
bg: Хранителни добавки
bn: খাদ্যে সংযোজনদ্রব্য
ca: Additius alimentaris
cs: Přídatná látka
da: Tilsætningsstof
de: Lebensmittelzusatzstoff
el: Πρόσθετο τροφίμων
eo: Manĝa aldonaĵo
es: Aditivos alimentarios
et: Toidulisaained
eu: Elikagai-gehigarri
fa: افزودنی‌های غذایی
fi: Lisäaineet, lisäaine
fr: Additifs alimentaires
ga: Breiseán
he: תוספי מזון
hi: खाद्य योगज
hr: Prehrambeni aditivi
hu: Élelmiszer-adalékanyag
id: Aditif makanan
io: Nutrivala adicioneso
it: Additivi alimentari, additivo alimentare
ja: 食品添加物
ko: 식품 첨가물
ky: Тамак кошумчалары
lb: Liewensmëttelzousätz
lt: Maisto priedai
mk: Прехранбен адитив
mn: Хүнсний нэмэлт бүтээгдэхүүн
ms: Bahan tambahan makanan
nb: Tilsetningsstoff
nl: Voedingsadditief
nn: Tilsetjingsstoff
pl: Dodatek do żywności
pt: Aditivo alimentar
ro: Aditiv alimentar
ru: Пищевые добавки
sh: Prehrambeni aditiv
sk: Prídavná látka v potravinách
sr: Prehrambeni aditivi, Прехрамбени адитиви
su: Aditif kadaharan
sv: Livsmedelstillsats
tg: Афзуданиҳои ғизоӣ
th: วัตถุเจือปนอาหาร
tr: Gıda katkısı
tt: Азык өстәмәләре
uk: Харчові додатки
vi: Phụ gia thực phẩm
zh: 食品添加剂

en: Lecithin
pl: Lecytyny, Lecytyna

en: Soy lecithin
bg: Соев лецитин
es: Lecitina de soja
fr: Lécithine de soja
hr: Sojin lecitin
ja: 大豆レシチン
lt: Sojų lecitinas
pl: Lecytyna sojowa, Lecytyny sojowe

en: Sunflower lecithin
de: Sonnenblumenlecithine
fr: Lécithine de tournesol
hr: Suncokretov lecitin
pl: Lecytyna słonecznikowa, Lecytyny słonecznikowe

en: baker's yeast
bg: Хлебна мая
de: Backhefe
es: levaduras de pastelería, levaduras de panadería, levaduras
fi: Leivinhiiva
fr: Levures de boulanger
hr: Pekarski kvasac
it: Lievito per panificazione
ja: パン酵母
lt: Kepimo mielės
nl: Gisten
pl: Drożdże, Drożdże piekarskie
zh: 酵母

en: Baker's yeast compressed
fr: Levure de boulanger compressée
hr: Stlačeni pekarski kvasac
it: Lievito di birra compresso
lt: Suspaustos kepimo mielės

en: Baking powder or raising agent
da: Bagepulver eller hævemiddel
es: Levadura en polvo o gasificante
fi: Leivinjauhe tai nostatusaine
fr: levure chimique
hr: Prašak za pecivo ili sredstvo za dizanje
it: Polvere da cottura o agente lievitante
lt: Kepimo milteliai arba kildinimo medžiaga
sv: Bakpulver eller jäsmedel, Bakpulver eller hävmedel

en: Baking powders, Baking powder
ar: ذرور الخبز
bg: Бакпулвер
ca: Rent químic
da: Bagepulver
de: Backpulver
eo: Bakpulvoro
et: Küpsetuspulber
eu: Legami kimiko
ga: Púdar bácála
is: Lyftiduft
ja: ベーキングパウダー
ko: 베이킹파우더
nb: Bakepulver
nl: Bakpoeders
nv: Biłʼeʼeliníʼ
pt: Levedura química
sv: Bakpulver
zh: 复配膨松剂

en: Yeast
bg: Мая
de: Hefe
es: Levadura
fi: hiiva
fr: Levures de bière
hr: kvasci, kvasac
it: Lievito
ja: 酵母, イースト
lt: Mielės
nl: Gist
tr: Maya

en: Anticaking agents
de: Rieselhilfen, Rieselhilfsmittel, Rieselfähigkeitsförderer, Antiagglomerationsmittel
es: Antiaglomerantes, Antiapelmazantes
fi: Paakkuuntumisenestoaineet
fr: Anti-agglomérants
hr: Sredstva protiv zgrudnjavanja
it: Agenti antiagglomeranti
lt: Lipnumą reguliuojančios medžiagos
nl: Antiklontermiddelen
zh: 抗结剂

en: Bicarbonates of soda, Sodium bicarbonates, Sodium bicarbonate, Sodium hydrogen carbonate, Baking soda, Bicarbonate of soda
xx: NaHCO₃, NaHCO3, E500ii, E-500ii
ar: بيكربونات الصوديوم
bg: Сода бикарбонат
da: Natron, Natriumhydrogencarbonat, Natriumbicarbonat
de: Natron
eo: Natria bikarbonato, Hidrogenkarbonato de natrio
es: Bicarbonatos de sodio, Bicarbonato sódico, Bicarbonato de sodio
fi: Ruokasooda, Natriumvetykarbonaatti, Natriumbikarbonaatti
fr: Bicarbonates de sodium, Bicarbonate de sodium, Bicarbonate de soude, Bicarbonate alimentaire
ga: Hidrigincharbónáit sóidiam
hr: Soda bikarbona
it: Bicarbonato di sodio, Sodio bicarbonato
lt: Natrio hidrokarbonatas, Natrio bikarbonatas, Kepimo milteliai, Kepimo soda, Maistinė soda
nb: Natron
nl: Natriumbicarbonaten, Natriumwaterstofcarbonaten, Dubbelkoolzure sodas
sv: Natriumvätekarbonater, Bikarbonater, Natriumbikarbonater

en: Flavors, flavours, flavouring, flavoring
ar: نكهة
be: Араматызатар
bg: Ароматизанти
bs: Aromatiziranje
ca: Sabor
cs: Chuť
cy: Ychwanegiadau
da: Aromaer
de: Aromen, Aroma
eo: Gustigaĵoj
es: Aromas, Aromatizantes, Sabor
et: Maitseained
eu: Zapore
fa: چشایی
fi: Maut, Maku
fr: Arômes, Arôme, Arômes alimentaires, Arôme alimentaire
ga: Blasóir
gl: Sabor
hi: सुवास
hr: arome, aroma
ht: Gou
hu: Ételízesítő
id: Perisa
it: Aromi, Sapore
ja: 香料
jv: Rasa
kk: Ароматты қосылыстар
ko: 향미
kw: Sawrans
la: Sapor
lt: Aromatai, Aromatas, Gardis
lv: Aromāts
ms: Perisa
nb: Aromaer
nl: Aromas, Smaakstoffen
nn: Aromaer, Aromaar
oc: Flavor
pl: Aromaty, Aromat
pt: Sabor
ro: Aromă
ru: Ароматизаторы
sl: Aroma
sv: Aromer
th: รส
tl: Lasa
tr: Aroma
tt: Хушисләткечләр
uk: Ароматизатор
vi: Hương liệu
zh: 香精, 香料

fr: Arômes pâtisserie, Arôme pâtisserie
nl: Gebaksaromas

en: Herbal distillates, Floral waters, Flower waters, Hydrosols, Hydrolates, Herbal waters, Essential waters
ar: تقطير عشبي
cy: Distyllad llysieuol
da: Blomstervand
de: Pflanzenwässer, Blütenwässer
es: Destilados herbal
fa: عرقیات گیاهی
fr: Hydrolat
ig: Herbal distillate
is: Blómavatn
ja: ハイドロゾル
pl: Wody kwiatowe, Woda kwiatowa
ru: Гидролат
sd: عرق
sl: Hidrolat
sv: Blomvatten
uk: Гідролат
zh: 純露

en: Orange blossom waters, Orange flower waters
ar: ماء الزهر
ca: Aiguanaf
cy: Dŵr blodau orennau
da: Appelsinblomstvand
de: Orangenblütenwasser
eo: Oranĝflora akvoj
es: Aguas de azahar
eu: Laranja-lore ura
fi: Appelsiininkukkavesi
fr: Eaux de fleur d'oranger, Eau de fleur d'oranger
it: Acqua di fiori d'arancio
ja: オレンジ花水
jv: Banyu kembang jeruk
ko: 오렌지꽃물
nl: Oranjebloesemwater
oc: Aiganafa
pl: Wody z kwiatów pomarańczy, Woda z kwiatów pomarańczy
pt: Água-de-flor-de-laranjeira
ru: Флёрдоранжевая вода
sl: Voda cvetov pomaranče
sv: Apelsinblomvatten
zh: 橙花水

en: Rose waters, Rosewaters
ar: ماء الورد, ماء ورد
az: Gülab
bg: Розова вода
bn: গোলাপ জল
ca: Aigua de roses
cy: Dŵr rhosod
da: Rosenvand
de: Rosenwasser
el: Ροδόνερο
eo: Rozakvoj
es: Aguas de rosas, Agua de rosas
eu: Arrosa-ur
fa: گلاب
fi: Ruusuvesi
fr: Eaux de rose, Eau de rose
hi: गुलाब जल
id: Air mawar
it: Acqua di rose
ja: ローズウォーター
jv: Banyu mawar
kk: Раушан суы
ko: 장미수
ku: Gulav
la: Aqua rosacea
mk: Розова вода
ml: അത്തർ
ms: Air mawar
nb: Rosenvann, Rosenvatn, Rosevann, Rosevatn
nl: Rozenwater
nn: Rosevatn
pl: Wody różane, Woda różana
pt: Agua de rosas
ro: Apă de trandafiri
ru: Розовая вода
sh: Ružina vodica
sl: Rožna voda
sr: Ружина водица
sv: Rosenvatten
ta: பன்னீர்
tg: Гулоб
th: น้ำดอกไม้เทศ
tl: Tubig-rosas
tr: Gülsuyu
uk: Трояндова вода
ur: عرق گلاب
uz: Atirgul suvi
vi: Nước hoa hồng
zh: 蔷薇水

en: Ascorbic acids, Ascorbates
ar: حمض الأسكوربيك
be: Аскарбінавая кіслата
bg: Аскорбинова киселина
bn: অ্যাস্করবিক অ্যাসিড
bs: Askorbinska kiselina
ca: Àcid ascòrbic
da: Ascorbinsyrer
de: Ascorbinsäuren
el: Ασκορβικό οξύ
es: Antiescorbútica
et: Askorbiinhape
fi: Askorbiinihappo
ga: Aigéad ascorbach
hr: Askorbinska kiselina
hu: Aszkorbinsav
ka: ასკორბინის მჟავა
ko: 아스코르빈산
lt: Askorbo rūgštis
lv: Askorbīnskābe
ms: Asid askorbik
mt: Aċidu askorbiku
nb: Askorbinsyrer
nn: Askorbinsyrer
or: ଆସକର୍ବିକ ଏସିଡ଼
pl: Kwas askorbinowy
pt: Ácido ascórbico
ro: Acid ascorbic
ru: Аскорбиновая кислота
sk: Kyselina askorbová
sl: Askorbinska kislina
sv: Askorbinsyror
ta: அசுக்கோபிக் அமிலம்
tt: Аскорбин әчелеге
uk: Аскорбінова кислота, Аскорбат
uz: Askorbin kislota
vi: Axít ascorbic
yi: אַסקאָרביק זויערן
zh: 抗壞血酸鹽